Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0802

Contribution and validation.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the contributions of a member to a limited cooperative association may consist of property transferred to, services performed for, or another benefit provided to the association or an agreement to transfer property to, perform services for, or provide another benefit to the association.

(2) The receipt and acceptance of contributions and the valuation of contributions must be reflected in a limited cooperative association's records.

(3) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors shall determine the value of a member's contributions received or to be received and the determination by the board of directors of valuation is conclusive for purposes of determining whether the member's contribution obligation has been met.

[ 2019 c 37 s 802.]